Utah statutes.
54-7-30.   Interstate commerce -- Title does not apply.

Neither this title nor any provisions thereof, except when specifically so stated, shall apply to or be construed to apply to commerce with foreign nations or commerce among the several states of this Union, except insofar as the same may be permitted under the provisions of the Constitution of the United States and the acts of Congress.



No Change Since 1953

